California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) If the director determines that a recipient has violated utilization controls placed upon that recipient pursuant to subdivision (b), the director may provide that the recipient shall receive medical assistance benefits referred, ordered, or prescribed through only one primary care provider of services for a maximum period of two years, which may be extended for an additional period upon a determination by the director that the potential for abuse still exists after notice and hearing, as set forth in subdivisions (f) and (g). The director shall afford the beneficiary an opportunity to nominate a primary care provider for department consideration. Circumvention of beneficiary utilization controls includes, but is not limited to, the following
 acts:

(1) Altering restricted Medi-Cal identification cards.

(2) Obtaining temporary nonrestricted cards.

(3) Establishing an additional nonrestricted eligibility status.

(d) If a recipient is convicted of any misdemeanor or felony involving fraud or abuse either of medical assistance benefits or services, or in connection with any public assistance program, the director may restrict the recipient’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits for a maximum period of two years, which may be extended for an additional period upon a determination by the director that the potential for fraud or abuse still exists and upon giving notice to the recipient setting forth the facts upon which the determination is made. The record of conviction or a certified copy
 thereof, certified by the clerk of the court in which the conviction is had, shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred. A plea or verdict of guilty, or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere, is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. The restriction shall not take effect earlier than the date of the director’s order. Restriction following a conviction is not subject to the proceedings required in subdivision (g).

(e) Where the director determines that a recipient deliberately abuses or misuses program benefits, the director may provide that the recipient shall receive medical assistance benefits referred, ordered, or prescribed through only one primary care provider of services for a maximum period of two years, which may be extended for an additional period upon a determination by the director that a potential for abuse still exists after notice and hearing as set forth in
 subdivisions (f) and (g). Deliberate abuse or misuse of program benefits includes, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) Forging prescriptions.

(2) Sale or lending of Medi-Cal identification cards.

(3) Collusion with providers for services or supplies.

(f) A recipient who commits a violation of subdivision (b), (c), or (e) shall be notified of the impending restriction, the reasons for the restriction and be provided an opportunity for a fair hearing.

(g) A recipient who commits a violation of subdivision (b), (c), or (e) is subject to restriction of fee for service Medi-Cal assistance benefits. The proceedings for restriction shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 7 (commencing
 with Section 10950) of Part 2, or any rule or regulation promulgated by the director pursuant to this section.

(h) The imposition of restrictions, pursuant to this section, with respect to the eligibility of any individual shall not affect the eligibility of any other person for medical assistance benefits under this program, regardless of the relationship between that individual and the other person.

(i) This section shall not apply in any instance where a bona fide emergency exists which requires immediate treatment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 425, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.16.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (l) of Section 14132, hearing aids are covered when supplied by a hearing aid dispenser on prescription of an otolaryngologist, or the attending physician where there is no otolaryngologist available in the community, plus an audiological evaluation, which shall be performed by or under the supervision of the attending physician or by a licensed audiologist.

(b) Prior to prescribing a hearing aid, a physician or otolaryngologist shall
 perform a complete ear, nose, and throat examination.

(c) Prior to coverage, a hearing aid assessment shall be performed by the dispensing practitioner, either a physician, a licensed audiologist, or a licensed hearing aid dispenser acting within the scope of practice as described in Section 3306 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) Coverage shall be based on the results of the examination, evaluation, and assessment required by this section.

(e) One hearing aid assessment within a 12-month period is a covered benefit. In the event the beneficiary receives more than one hearing aid assessment within a 12-month period, Medi-Cal shall reimburse the first valid claim received by the program for only one hearing aid assessment unless additional assessments are deemed to be medically necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 704, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.2.

(a) The director shall include in the Medi-Cal list of contract drugs any drug approved for the treatment of cancer by the federal Food and Drug Administration, so long as the manufacturer has executed a contract with the Health Care Financing Administration which provides for rebates in accordance with Section 1396r-8 of Title 42 of the United States Code. These drugs shall be exempt from the contract
 requirements of Section 14105.33.

(b) In addition to any drug added to the list of contract drugs pursuant to subdivision (a), any drug that meets either of the following criteria and for which the manufacturer has executed a contract with the Health Care Financing Administration that provides for rebates in accordance with Section 1396r-8 of Title 42 of the United States Code, shall be a Medi-Cal benefit, subject to utilization controls, unless the contract requirements of Section 14105.33 have been complied with:

(1) Any drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for treatment of opportunistic infections associated with cancer.

(2) Any drug or biologic used in an anticancer chemotherapeutic regimen for a medically accepted indication, which has either been approved by the federal Food and Drug
 Administration, or recognized for that use in a compendia listed in Section 1927 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396r-8).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 479, Sec. 6.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.225.

Notwithstanding any other law, the department shall not provide or pay for any prescription drug or other therapy to treat erectile dysfunction for any person who is required to register pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code, except to the extent required under federal law. The department may require from the Department of Justice the information necessary to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 469, Sec. 3.   Effective October 4, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.23.

(a) To the extent that federal financial participation is not available, the provision of drug benefits under this chapter to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are eligible for drug benefits under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or under a Medicare Advantage-Prescription Drug plan (MA-PD plan) under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.), is eliminated, except as otherwise provided under this section.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, only drug benefits for which federal financial participation is available shall be provided under this chapter to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary, except as otherwise provided under subdivision (c).

(2) As a benefit under this chapter, the department, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available, may elect to provide a drug or drugs in a class of drugs not covered under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.) to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(3) As a benefit under this chapter, and only to the
 extent that federal financial participation is available, the department shall provide a drug or drugs to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries who are otherwise eligible to receive the drug or drugs due to their entitlement under Title 42 United States Code, Chapter 7, Title XVIII, Part A or their enrollment under Title 42 United States Code, Chapter 7, Title XVIII, Part B.

(4) Except as provided under paragraph (3) and subdivision (c), nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require the department to provide any drug or drugs not covered under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.) if federal financial participation is not available.

(c) (1) The department shall review the drug formularies of
 prescription drug plans under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or MA-PD plans under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.) available to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(2) The department shall develop a process that would allow the department to provide to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary, on an emergency basis only, coverage for a drug or drugs not included on the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s prescription drug plan’s formulary or by prior authorization under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or MA-PD plans under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.) for which federal financial participation is not available.

(3) Only to the extent that the Legislature made a
 specific appropriation to fund the provision of emergency drug benefits for which federal financial participation is not available to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries, the department shall provide, through the process described in paragraph (2), these emergency drug benefits to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary only when all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The drug is not available to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary under his or her plan’s drug formulary or by prior authorization.

(B) The pharmacist provides or dispenses the drug as an emergency service.

(C) The quantity of the drug provided or dispensed in no greater than a 60-day supply.

(D) The pharmacist has not previously provided or dispensed nor has knowledge
 that another pharmacist has provided or dispensed the same drug for that full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary on or after January 1, 2006.

(E) The date of service is from January 1, 2006, through December 31, 2006, inclusive.

(4) The department may impose a pre- or post-service prepayment or postpayment review or audit, to review the medical necessity of emergency services provided to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(d) The department shall seek approval of any amendments to the state plan necessary to implement this section as required by Title XIX of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.).

(e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department
 may implement, interpret or make specific this section by means of all county letters, provider bulletins, or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department may adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, and only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose, the department shall provide on a time-limited basis, as described in paragraphs (7) and (8), drug benefits to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary who is not able to obtain drug benefits from his or her Medicare Drug Plan only when one or more of the following conditions are met:

(A) The pharmacy has submitted a claim for the provision of drug benefits to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare
 Drug Plan and the claim has been denied payment for reasons other than processing errors or omissions made by the pharmacy, lack of medical necessity, or health or safety reasons.

(B) The pharmacy is unable to submit a claim for the provision of drug benefits solely due to the unavailability of complete or accurate Medicare Drug Plan enrollment information from the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or entities under contract with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to provide enrollment information.

(C) The Medicare Drug Plan provides information that the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s deductible or copayment amount is higher than the copayment amounts that are established by Medicare for full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(2) The director may impose a pre- or post-service prepayment or postpayment review or audit to determine whether a pharmacy has accurately and in good faith established the existence of any condition certified by the pharmacy pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1) in support of a submitted claim to the department.

(3) If the claim submitted by the pharmacy to the Medicare Drug Plan meets the circumstances described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the department shall pay the Medi-Cal rate less the Medicare Drug Plan reimbursement amount and the Medicare copayment amount.

(4) To obtain reimbursement from the department, a pharmacy must be an enrolled provider in the Medi-Cal program and certify on its claims under penalty of perjury that one of the conditions specified in paragraph (1) exists.

(5) The department shall seek reimbursement from the federal government of all funds spent to comply with the provisions of this subdivision.

(6) To the extent that the department reimburses a pharmacy for claims authorized under this subdivision, the director shall have the right to recover or recoup the full cost expended by the state for that reimbursement from the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan.

(7) Reimbursement for claims authorized under this subdivision shall be limited to those drug benefits provided to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary from January 12, 2006, to February 15, 2006, inclusive.

(8) After February 15, 2006, the Governor may, upon notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, extend coverage for
 drug benefits to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary for coverage periods of up to 30 days each. In no event shall the reimbursement authorized by this paragraph extend beyond May 16, 2006.

(9) Any drug benefits made available to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries under the authority of this subdivision shall be limited to the funds appropriated by the Legislature to the department for this purpose. These drug benefits shall not be deemed to be an entitlement.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, and only to the extent that funds are appropriated for this purpose, beginning May 17, 2006, and ending January 31, 2007, the department shall provide emergency drug benefits to a full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary who is unable to obtain drug benefits from his or her Medicare Drug Plan only when one or more of the following
 conditions are met:

(A) The pharmacy has submitted a claim for the provision of drug benefits to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan and the claim has been denied payment due to error by the Medicare Program and the pharmacy has made a good faith effort to resolve the error with the Medicare Drug Plan and the Medicare Program.

(B) The pharmacy is unable to submit a claim for the provision of drug benefits solely due to incomplete or inaccurate Medicare Drug Plan enrollment information from the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan, the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, or entities under contract with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to provide enrollment information, and the pharmacy has attempted to resolve these problems with the Medicare facilitated enrollment contractor and the Medicare Drug
 Plan, where appropriate.

(C) The Medicare Drug Plan provides information that the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s deductible or copayment amount is higher than the copayment amounts that are established by Medicare for full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries.

(D) Request for prior authorization or exception to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan is required and was sought by the pharmacist, but the pharmacy does not receive a response within 24 hours for an emergency drug or within 72 hours for a nonemergency drug. When submitting a request for prior authorization to the department, a pharmacy shall show proof of the submission of the request that was made to either the Medicare Drug Plan or the beneficiary’s prescribing physician.

(2) In providing these benefits, the department
 shall implement prepayment utilization controls, including prior authorization, and may implement postpayment reviews or audits to determine whether a pharmacy has accurately and in good faith established the existence of any condition certified by the pharmacy pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1) in support of a submitted claim to the department.

(3) If the claim submitted by the pharmacy to the Medicare Drug Plan meets the circumstances described in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1), the department shall pay only the difference between the copayment amount established by Medicare for full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries and the actual copayment amount charged.

(4) To obtain reimbursement from the department, a pharmacy must be an enrolled provider in the Medi-Cal program and certify on its claims under penalty of perjury that one of the conditions
 specified in paragraph (1) exists.

(5) To the extent that the department reimburses a pharmacy for claims authorized under this subdivision, the director shall have the right to recover or recoup the full cost expended by the state for that reimbursement from the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan.

(6) Any drug benefits made available to full-benefit dual eligible beneficiaries under the authority of this subdivision shall not be deemed to be an entitlement. Beginning September 1, 2006, the department shall not cover drug benefits when prior authorization or exception to the full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary’s Medicare Drug Plan is required, unless that authorization was sought by the physician and the Medicare Drug Plan does not provide a response within 24 hours for an emergency drug or within 72 hours for a nonemergency drug.

(h) (1) For the purposes of this section, a “full-benefit dual eligible beneficiary” means an individual who meets both of the following criteria:

(A) The beneficiary is eligible or would be eligible for coverage for the month for covered Part D drugs under a prescription drug plan under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.).

(B) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the beneficiary is determined eligible for full-scope services, including drug benefits, for which federal financial participation is available.

(2) For the purposes of this section, “Medicare Drug
 Plan” means a prescription drug plan under Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.) or under a MA-PD plan under Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.).

(i) Subdivisions (a) and (b) and paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall become operative on January 1, 2006.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   Effective May 15, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.25.

(a) The director shall identify those surgical and medical procedures capable of outpatient performance and establish conditions for assuring performance in an outpatient rather than inpatient setting when medically appropriate.

(b) The director shall identify and apply appropriate utilization controls to review outpatient and office medical and surgical procedures for medical necessity and program coverage. The director may under this section identify and require prior authorization for any specified outpatient or office medical or
 surgical procedure performed during a month without regard to the provisions of Section 14133.1, provided that, with respect to outpatient or office medical procedures, those medical procedures which remain not subject to prior authorization are sufficient in number and scope as to achieve the general purpose of Section 14133. 1.

(c) The director may establish a schedule of differential reimbursement rates to the operating surgeon for surgery procedures. Those surgery procedures which can safely be performed on an outpatient basis may be reimbursed at a higher level when performed in an outpatient setting than the same procedures performed on an inpatient basis.

(d) Provisions of this section shall not be applied to mental health services as defined under Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) or Section 14021, or any other mental health services funded by the Medi-Cal
 program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 60.   Effective September 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.3.

(a) The director shall require fully documented medical justification from providers that the requested services are medically necessary or a medical necessity, as defined in Section 14059.5, on all requests for prior authorization.

(b) For services not subject to prior authorization controls, offered by noncontract hospitals in closed health facility planning areas to beneficiaries who were experiencing life-threatening or emergency situations, but could not be stabilized sufficiently in order to facilitate being transported to contracting hospitals, the director shall additionally determine utilization controls that shall be applied to ensure that the health care services provided and the conditions treated, are medically
 necessary to prevent significant illness, alleviate severe pain, to protect life, or prevent significant disability. These utilization controls shall take into account those diseases, illnesses, or injuries that require preventive health services or treatment to prevent serious deterioration of health.

(c) Nothing in this section shall preclude payment for family planning services or early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and treatment services mandated by federal law.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a “noncontract hospital” means a hospital that has not contracted with the department for the provision of inpatient services pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081).

(e) This section shall not be applied to mental health services as defined under Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) or
 Section 14021, or any other mental health services funded by the Medi-Cal program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 855, Sec. 2.   (SB 1287)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.37.

For drugs covered under this chapter requiring prior authorization, the department shall ensure the timely and efficient processing of authorization requests by doing all of the following:

(a) Providing a response by telephone or other means of telecommunication within 24 hours of the receipt of an authorization request. 

(b) To the extent permitted by federal law, providing for the dispensing of at least a 72-hour supply of a covered drug in an emergency situation, as defined by federal regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 563, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.4.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, utilization controls adopted by the State Department of Health Services shall not include prior authorization for portable X-ray services provided in nursing facilities and all categories of intermediate care facilities for the developmentally disabled, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1329, Sec. 30.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.45.

(a) Utilization controls adopted by the department shall not include prior authorization for renal dialysis treatment provided to eligible recipients for the treatment of end stage renal disease.

(b) For purposes of this section, “end stage renal disease” is the same as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 1794.02 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with
 Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by provider manual or similar notice without further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 321, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.6.

In acting upon prior authorization requests for nonemergency medical transportation services, the department shall consider all relevant information in its possession regarding the beneficiary for whom services are requested. The department shall act upon such requests in a timely and expeditious manner. The department shall not form separate units within its field offices to receive and act upon prior authorization requests for nonemergency medical transportation. The provisions of this section shall be applicable only in counties having a population in excess of 6,000,000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.65.

Prior authorization for the use of nonemergency medical transportation services by patients to and from dialysis treatment shall be approved for a period of up to one year when the patient has received the transportation services for the immediately preceding 12 months, the request for renewed prior authorization is supported by a physician’s certification that the patient’s condition is unlikely to improve during the period covered by the request, and the department has determined that there is medical necessity for the service. Whenever there is a change or improvement in the patient’s condition, the physician shall submit a new certification to the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 863, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.7.

The department shall not require emergency certification statements for hospital inpatient claims which have been reviewed and approved by the department for appropriateness of emergency admission or length of stay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1164, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.8.

(a) A bone marrow transplant for the treatment of cancer for beneficiaries who are eligible for full-scope benefits under this chapter, shall be reimbursable under this chapter, when all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The bone marrow transplant is recommended by the recipient’s physician.

(2) The bone marrow transplant is performed in a hospital that is approved for participation in the Medi-Cal
 program.

(3) The bone marrow transplant is a reasonable course of treatment and is approved by the hospital medical policy committee when there is an existing committee or a committee can be established.

(4) The bone marrow transplant has been deemed appropriate for the recipient by the program’s medical consultant. The medical consultant shall not disapprove the bone marrow transplant solely on the basis that it is classified as experimental or investigational.

(b) The program shall provide reimbursement for both donor and recipient surgery.

(c) The department may establish inpatient rates of reimbursement not in accordance with the state plan for those hospitals not under contract with the state pursuant to Article 2.6 (commencing with Section 14081),
 provided that the state plan is subsequently amended to reflect the method of reimbursement.

(d) This section shall not be construed as prohibiting reimbursement for any bone marrow transplants otherwise provided for under this chapter.

(e) Any bone marrow transplant authorized by the department pursuant to this section shall be subject to utilization controls.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, provider bulletins, or other instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 300, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.85.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, prior authorization shall not be required for hospice services.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any admission that violates federal law.

(b) Prior authorization shall be required for inpatient hospice services.

(c) This section shall become inoperative on
 July 1, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 107.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.9.

The implementation of prior authorization permitted by subdivision (a) of Section 14133 shall be subject to all of the following provisions:

(a) The department shall secure a toll free phone number for the use of providers of Medi-Cal services listed in Section 14132. For providers, the department shall provide access to an individual knowledgeable in the
 program to provide Medi-Cal providers with information regarding available services. Access shall include a toll-free phone number that provides reasonable access to that person. The number shall be operated 24 hours a day, seven days a week.

(b) For major categories of treatment subject to prior authorization, the department shall publicize and continue to develop its list of objective medical criteria that indicate when authorization should be granted. Any request meeting these criteria, as determined by the department, shall be approved, or deferred as authorized in subdivision (e) by specific medical information.

(c) The objective medical criteria required by subdivision (d) shall be adopted and published in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, and shall be made available at appropriate cost.

(d) When a proposed treatment meets objective medical criteria, and is not contraindicated, authorization for the treatment shall be provided within an average of five working days. When a treatment authorization request is not subject to objective medical criteria, a decision on medical necessity shall be made by a professional medical employee or contractor of the department within an average of five working days.

(e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (c) and (d), the department shall adopt, by emergency regulations as provided by this subdivision, a list of elective services that the director determines may be nonurgent. In determining these services, the department shall be guided by commonly accepted medical practice parameters. Authorization for these services may be deferred for a period of up to 90 days. In making determinations regarding these referrals, the department may use criteria separate from, or in
 addition to, those specified in subdivision (c). These deferrals shall be determined through the treatment authorization request process. When a proposed service is on the list of elective services that the director determines may be considered nonurgent, authorization for the service shall be granted or deferred within an average of 10 working days. The State Department of Health Services may adopt emergency regulations to implement this subdivision in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The initial adoption of emergency regulations and one readoption of the initial regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those regulations shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by
 this subdivision shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and publication in the California Code of Regulations and shall remain in effect for no more than 120 days.

 (f) Final decisions of the department on denial of requests for prior authorization for inpatient acute hospital care shall be reviewable upon request of a provider by a Professional Standards Review Organization established pursuant to Public Law 92-603, or a successor organization if either of the following applies:

(1) The original decision on the request was not performed by a Professional Standards Review Organization, or its successor organization.

(2) The original decision on the request was performed by a Professional Standards Review Organization, or its successor organization, and the
 original decision was reversed by the department. The department shall contract with one or more of these organizations to, among other things, perform the review function required by this subdivision. The review performed by the contracting organization shall result in a finding that the department’s decision is either appropriate or unjustified, in accordance with existing law, regulation, and medical criteria. The cost of each review shall be borne by the party that does not prevail.

The decision of this body shall be reviewable by civil action.

 (g) This section, and any amendments made to Section 14103.6 by Assembly Bill 2254 of the 1985–86 Regular Legislative Session, shall not apply to treatment or services provided under contracts awarded by the department under which the contractor agrees to assume the risk of utilization or costs of services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 206.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14134.2.

The reimbursement rate for any three or more laboratory services for the same patient on the same day, which are commonly performed in an automated manner, as defined by the department, shall be reimbursed at the rate established for automated services. The director shall exempt from this provision laboratory services performed for urgent medical reasons or in rural areas, as defined by the department, if performed as individual tests.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 1163, Sec. 17.   Effective October 2, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

14134.25.

(a) Tobacco cessation services are covered benefits under the Medi-Cal program, subject to utilization controls. Tobacco cessation services shall include all intervention recommendations, as periodically updated, assigned a grade A or B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force. Tobacco cessation services shall include quit attempts based on medical necessity, as defined in Section 14059.5, and consistent with United States Preventive Services Task Force grade A and B recommendations, with no required break between attempts, for all beneficiaries 18 years of age and older who use tobacco. For beneficiaries under 18 years of age, tobacco cessation services shall be provided in accordance with both the American Academy of Pediatrics Bright Futures periodicity schedule and anticipatory guidance as periodically updated,
 as well as services assigned a grade A or B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force.

(b) For purposes of this section, in addition to the services described in subdivision (a) and only to the extent consistent with the intervention recommendations, as periodically updated, assigned a grade A or B by the United States Preventive Services Task Force, tobacco cessation services for beneficiaries 18 years of age and older shall include all of the following:

(1) At least four tobacco cessation counseling sessions per quit attempt that may be conducted in person or by telephone and individually or as part of a group, at the beneficiary’s option.

(2) (A) A tobacco cessation treatment regimen of any medication approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration, and that is a covered
 Medi-Cal benefit, for tobacco cessation, including prescription and over-the-counter medications, in accordance with United States Preventive Services Task Force grade A and B recommendations.

(B) A prescription from a provider with authority to prescribe and proof of Medi-Cal coverage shall be sufficient documentation to fill a prescription for over-the-counter tobacco cessation medications.

(c) Beneficiaries who are covered under this section shall not be required to receive a particular form of tobacco cessation service as a condition of receiving any other form of tobacco cessation service.

(d) Effective January 1, 2017, the department shall seek any federal approvals that the department determines are necessary to implement this section.

(e) This
 section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 283.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14134.5.

All of the following requirements apply to the provision of services pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 14132:

(a) “Comprehensive perinatal provider” means any general practice physician, family physician and surgeon, obstetrician-gynecologist, pediatrician, certified nurse-midwife, a group, any of whose members is one of the above-named providers, or any preferred provider organization or clinic enrolled in the Medi-Cal program and certified pursuant to the standards of this section.

(b) “Perinatal” means the period from the establishment of pregnancy to one month following delivery.

(c) “Comprehensive perinatal services” shall include, but not be limited to, the provision of the combination of services developed through the former Department of Health Services Obstetrical Access Pilot Program provided or coordinated by a comprehensive perinatal provider.
